Illinois, session 104th, HB1374.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-8.1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-8.1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-8.1)7    Sec. 27-8.1. Health examinations and immunizations. 8    (1) In compliance with rules and regulations which the 9Department of Public Health shall promulgate, and except as 10hereinafter provided, all children in Illinois shall have a 11health examination as follows: within one year prior to 12entering kindergarten or the first grade of any public, 13private, or parochial elementary school; upon entering the 14sixth and ninth grades of any public, private, or parochial 15school; prior to entrance into any public, private, or 16parochial nursery school; and, irrespective of grade, 17immediately prior to or upon entrance into any public, 18private, or parochial school or nursery school, each child 19shall present proof of having been examined in accordance with 20this Section and the rules and regulations promulgated 21hereunder. Any child who received a health examination within 22one year prior to entering the fifth grade for the 2007-2008 23school year is not required to receive an additional health   HB1374- 2 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1examination in order to comply with the provisions of Public 2Act 95-422 when he or she attends school for the 2008-2009 3school year, unless the child is attending school for the 4first time as provided in this paragraph. 5    A tuberculosis skin test screening shall be included as a 6required part of each health examination included under this 7Section if the child resides in an area designated by the 8Department of Public Health as having a high incidence of 9tuberculosis. Additional health examinations of pupils, 10including eye examinations, may be required when deemed 11necessary by school authorities. Parents are encouraged to 12have their children undergo eye examinations at the same 13points in time required for health examinations.14    (1.5) In compliance with rules adopted by the Department 15of Public Health and except as otherwise provided in this 16Section, all children in kindergarten and the second, sixth, 17and ninth grades of any public, private, or parochial school 18shall have a dental examination. Each of these children shall 19present proof of having been examined by a dentist in 20accordance with this Section and rules adopted under this 21Section before May 15th of the school year. If a child in the 22second, sixth, or ninth grade fails to present proof by May 2315th, the school may hold the child's report card until one of 24the following occurs: (i) the child presents proof of a 25completed dental examination or (ii) the child presents proof 26that a dental examination will take place within 60 days after   HB1374- 3 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1May 15th. A school may not withhold a child's report card 2during a school year in which the Governor has declared a 3disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 47 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. The 5Department of Public Health shall establish, by rule, a waiver 6for children who show an undue burden or a lack of access to a 7dentist. Each public, private, and parochial school must give 8notice of this dental examination requirement to the parents 9and guardians of students at least 60 days before May 15th of 10each school year. 11    (1.10) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, all 12children enrolling in kindergarten in a public, private, or 13parochial school on or after January 1, 2008 (the effective 14date of Public Act 95-671) and any student enrolling for the 15first time in a public, private, or parochial school on or 16after January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1795-671) shall have an eye examination. Each of these children 18shall present proof of having been examined by a physician 19licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches or a 20licensed optometrist within the previous year, in accordance 21with this Section and rules adopted under this Section, before 22October 15th of the school year. If the child fails to present 23proof by October 15th, the school may hold the child's report 24card until one of the following occurs: (i) the child presents 25proof of a completed eye examination or (ii) the child 26presents proof that an eye examination will take place within   HB1374- 4 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b160 days after October 15th. A school may not withhold a child's 2report card during a school year in which the Governor has 3declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 4to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 5The Department of Public Health shall establish, by rule, a 6waiver for children who show an undue burden or a lack of 7access to a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of 8its branches who provides eye examinations or to a licensed 9optometrist. Each public, private, and parochial school must 10give notice of this eye examination requirement to the parents 11and guardians of students in compliance with rules of the 12Department of Public Health. Nothing in this Section shall be 13construed to allow a school to exclude a child from attending 14because of a parent's or guardian's failure to obtain an eye 15examination for the child. 16    (2) The Department of Public Health shall promulgate rules 17and regulations specifying the examinations and procedures 18that constitute a health examination, which shall include an 19age-appropriate developmental screening, an age-appropriate 20social and emotional screening, and the collection of data 21relating to asthma and obesity (including at a minimum, date 22of birth, gender, height, weight, blood pressure, and date of 23exam), and a dental examination and may recommend by rule that 24certain additional examinations be performed. The rules and 25regulations of the Department of Public Health shall specify 26that a tuberculosis skin test screening shall be included as a   HB1374- 5 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1required part of each health examination included under this 2Section if the child resides in an area designated by the 3Department of Public Health as having a high incidence of 4tuberculosis. With respect to the developmental screening and 5the social and emotional screening, the Department of Public 6Health must, no later than January 1, 2019, develop rules and 7appropriate revisions to the Child Health Examination form in 8conjunction with a statewide organization representing school 9boards; a statewide organization representing pediatricians; 10statewide organizations representing individuals holding 11Illinois educator licenses with school support personnel 12endorsements, including school social workers, school 13psychologists, and school nurses; a statewide organization 14representing children's mental health experts; a statewide 15organization representing school principals; the Director of 16Healthcare and Family Services or his or her designee, the 17State Superintendent of Education or his or her designee; and 18representatives of other appropriate State agencies and, at a 19minimum, must recommend the use of validated screening tools 20appropriate to the child's age or grade, and, with regard to 21the social and emotional screening, require recording only 22whether or not the screening was completed. The rules shall 23take into consideration the screening recommendations of the 24American Academy of Pediatrics and must be consistent with the 25State Board of Education's social and emotional learning 26standards. The Department of Public Health shall specify that   HB1374- 6 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1a diabetes screening as defined by rule shall be included as a 2required part of each health examination. Diabetes testing is 3not required. Questions on the safe storage of firearms in a 4child's home shall be included as a required part of each 5health examination. The Department of Public Health shall 6develop rules and appropriate revisions to the child health 7examination form to implement this requirement. The questions 8shall include: "Are there firearms in your home?" and "If so, 9are they stored in a locked safe and inaccessible to any minor 10in the home?". 11    Physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of its 12branches, licensed advanced practice registered nurses, or 13licensed physician assistants shall be responsible for the 14performance of the health examinations, other than dental 15examinations, eye examinations, and vision and hearing 16screening, and shall sign all report forms required by 17subsection (4) of this Section that pertain to those portions 18of the health examination for which the physician, advanced 19practice registered nurse, or physician assistant is 20responsible. If a registered nurse performs any part of a 21health examination, then a physician licensed to practice 22medicine in all of its branches must review and sign all 23required report forms. Licensed dentists shall perform all 24dental examinations and shall sign all report forms required 25by subsection (4) of this Section that pertain to the dental 26examinations. Physicians licensed to practice medicine in all   HB1374- 7 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1its branches or licensed optometrists shall perform all eye 2examinations required by this Section and shall sign all 3report forms required by subsection (4) of this Section that 4pertain to the eye examination. For purposes of this Section, 5an eye examination shall at a minimum include history, visual 6acuity, subjective refraction to best visual acuity near and 7far, internal and external examination, and a glaucoma 8evaluation, as well as any other tests or observations that in 9the professional judgment of the doctor are necessary. Vision 10and hearing screening tests, which shall not be considered 11examinations as that term is used in this Section, shall be 12conducted in accordance with rules and regulations of the 13Department of Public Health, and by individuals whom the 14Department of Public Health has certified. In these rules and 15regulations, the Department of Public Health shall require 16that individuals conducting vision screening tests give a 17child's parent or guardian written notification, before the 18vision screening is conducted, that states, "Vision screening 19is not a substitute for a complete eye and vision evaluation by 20an eye doctor. Your child is not required to undergo this 21vision screening if an optometrist or ophthalmologist has 22completed and signed a report form indicating that an 23examination has been administered within the previous 12 24months.".25    (2.5) With respect to the developmental screening and the 26social and emotional screening portion of the health   HB1374- 8 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1examination, each child may present proof of having been 2screened in accordance with this Section and the rules adopted 3under this Section before October 15th of the school year. 4With regard to the social and emotional screening only, the 5examining health care provider shall only record whether or 6not the screening was completed. If the child fails to present 7proof of the developmental screening or the social and 8emotional screening portions of the health examination by 9October 15th of the school year, qualified school support 10personnel may, with a parent's or guardian's consent, offer 11the developmental screening or the social and emotional 12screening to the child. Each public, private, and parochial 13school must give notice of the developmental screening and 14social and emotional screening requirements to the parents and 15guardians of students in compliance with the rules of the 16Department of Public Health. Nothing in this Section shall be 17construed to allow a school to exclude a child from attending 18because of a parent's or guardian's failure to obtain a 19developmental screening or a social and emotional screening 20for the child. Once a developmental screening or a social and 21emotional screening is completed and proof has been presented 22to the school, the school may, with a parent's or guardian's 23consent, make available appropriate school personnel to work 24with the parent or guardian, the child, and the provider who 25signed the screening form to obtain any appropriate 26evaluations and services as indicated on the form and in other   HB1374- 9 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1information and documentation provided by the parents, 2guardians, or provider.3    (3) Every child shall, at or about the same time as he or 4she receives a health examination required by subsection (1) 5of this Section, present to the local school proof of having 6received such immunizations against preventable communicable 7diseases as the Department of Public Health shall require by 8rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this Section and 9the Communicable Disease Prevention Act.10    (4) The individuals conducting the health examination, 11dental examination, or eye examination shall record the fact 12of having conducted the examination, and such additional 13information as required, including for a health examination 14data relating to asthma and obesity (including at a minimum, 15date of birth, gender, height, weight, blood pressure, and 16date of exam), on uniform forms which the Department of Public 17Health and the State Board of Education shall prescribe for 18statewide use. The examiner shall summarize on the report form 19any condition that he or she suspects indicates a need for 20special services, including for a health examination factors 21relating to asthma or obesity. The duty to summarize on the 22report form does not apply to social and emotional screenings. 23The confidentiality of the information and records relating to 24the developmental screening and the social and emotional 25screening shall be determined by the statutes, rules, and 26professional ethics governing the type of provider conducting   HB1374- 10 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1the screening. The individuals confirming the administration 2of required immunizations shall record as indicated on the 3form that the immunizations were administered.4    (5) If a child does not submit proof of having had either 5the health examination or the immunization as required, then 6the child shall be examined or receive the immunization, as 7the case may be, and present proof by October 15 of the current 8school year, or by an earlier date of the current school year 9established by a school district. To establish a date before 10October 15 of the current school year for the health 11examination or immunization as required, a school district 12must give notice of the requirements of this Section 60 days 13prior to the earlier established date. If for medical reasons 14one or more of the required immunizations must be given after 15October 15 of the current school year, or after an earlier 16established date of the current school year, then the child 17shall present, by October 15, or by the earlier established 18date, a schedule for the administration of the immunizations 19and a statement of the medical reasons causing the delay, both 20the schedule and the statement being issued by the physician, 21advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, 22registered nurse, or local health department that will be 23responsible for administration of the remaining required 24immunizations. If a child does not comply by October 15, or by 25the earlier established date of the current school year, with 26the requirements of this subsection, then the local school   HB1374- 11 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1authority shall exclude that child from school until such time 2as the child presents proof of having had the health 3examination as required and presents proof of having received 4those required immunizations which are medically possible to 5receive immediately. During a child's exclusion from school 6for noncompliance with this subsection, the child's parents or 7legal guardian shall be considered in violation of Section 826-1 and subject to any penalty imposed by Section 26-10. This 9subsection (5) does not apply to dental examinations, eye 10examinations, and the developmental screening and the social 11and emotional screening portions of the health examination. If 12the student is an out-of-state transfer student and does not 13have the proof required under this subsection (5) before 14October 15 of the current year or whatever date is set by the 15school district, then he or she may only attend classes (i) if 16he or she has proof that an appointment for the required 17vaccinations has been scheduled with a party authorized to 18submit proof of the required vaccinations. If the proof of 19vaccination required under this subsection (5) is not 20submitted within 30 days after the student is permitted to 21attend classes, then the student is not to be permitted to 22attend classes until proof of the vaccinations has been 23properly submitted. No school district or employee of a school 24district shall be held liable for any injury or illness to 25another person that results from admitting an out-of-state 26transfer student to class that has an appointment scheduled   HB1374- 12 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1pursuant to this subsection (5). 2    (6) Every school shall report to the State Board of 3Education by November 15, in the manner which that agency 4shall require, the number of children who have received the 5necessary immunizations and the health examination (other than 6a dental examination or eye examination) as required, 7indicating, of those who have not received the immunizations 8and examination as required, the number of children who are 9exempt from health examination and immunization requirements 10on religious or medical grounds as provided in subsection (8). 11On or before December 1 of each year, every public school 12district and registered nonpublic school shall make publicly 13available the immunization data they are required to submit to 14the State Board of Education by November 15. The immunization 15data made publicly available must be identical to the data the 16school district or school has reported to the State Board of 17Education.18    Every school shall report to the State Board of Education 19by June 30, in the manner that the State Board requires, the 20number of children who have received the required dental 21examination, indicating, of those who have not received the 22required dental examination, the number of children who are 23exempt from the dental examination on religious grounds as 24provided in subsection (8) of this Section and the number of 25children who have received a waiver under subsection (1.5) of 26this Section.  HB1374- 13 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1    Every school shall report to the State Board of Education 2by June 30, in the manner that the State Board requires, the 3number of children who have received the required eye 4examination, indicating, of those who have not received the 5required eye examination, the number of children who are 6exempt from the eye examination as provided in subsection (8) 7of this Section, the number of children who have received a 8waiver under subsection (1.10) of this Section, and the total 9number of children in noncompliance with the eye examination 10requirement.11    The reported information under this subsection (6) shall 12be provided to the Department of Public Health by the State 13Board of Education.14    (7) Upon determining that the number of pupils who are 15required to be in compliance with subsection (5) of this 16Section is below 90% of the number of pupils enrolled in the 17school district, 10% of each State aid payment made pursuant 18to Section 18-8.05 or 18-8.15 to the school district for such 19year may be withheld by the State Board of Education until the 20number of students in compliance with subsection (5) is the 21applicable specified percentage or higher.22    (8) Children of parents or legal guardians who object to 23health, dental, or eye examinations or any part thereof, to 24immunizations, or to vision and hearing screening tests on 25religious grounds shall not be required to undergo the 26examinations, tests, or immunizations to which they so object   HB1374- 14 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1if such parents or legal guardians present to the appropriate 2local school authority a signed Certificate of Religious 3Exemption detailing the grounds for objection and the specific 4immunizations, tests, or examinations to which they object. 5The grounds for objection must set forth the specific 6religious belief that conflicts with the examination, test, 7immunization, or other medical intervention. The signed 8certificate shall also reflect the parent's or legal 9guardian's understanding of the school's exclusion policies in 10the case of a vaccine-preventable disease outbreak or 11exposure. The certificate must also be signed by the 12authorized examining health care provider responsible for the 13performance of the child's health examination confirming that 14the provider provided education to the parent or legal 15guardian on the benefits of immunization and the health risks 16to the student and to the community of the communicable 17diseases for which immunization is required in this State. 18However, the health care provider's signature on the 19certificate reflects only that education was provided and does 20not allow a health care provider grounds to determine a 21religious exemption. Those receiving immunizations required 22under this Code shall be provided with the relevant vaccine 23information statements that are required to be disseminated by 24the federal National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986, 25which may contain information on circumstances when a vaccine 26should not be administered, prior to administering a vaccine.   HB1374- 15 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1A healthcare provider may consider including without 2limitation the nationally accepted recommendations from 3federal agencies such as the Advisory Committee on 4Immunization Practices, the information outlined in the 5relevant vaccine information statement, and vaccine package 6inserts, along with the healthcare provider's clinical 7judgment, to determine whether any child may be more 8susceptible to experiencing an adverse vaccine reaction than 9the general population, and, if so, the healthcare provider 10may exempt the child from an immunization or adopt an 11individualized immunization schedule. The Certificate of 12Religious Exemption shall be created by the Department of 13Public Health and shall be made available and used by parents 14and legal guardians by the beginning of the 2015-2016 school 15year. Parents or legal guardians must submit the Certificate 16of Religious Exemption to their local school authority prior 17to entering kindergarten, sixth grade, and ninth grade for 18each child for which they are requesting an exemption. The 19religious objection stated need not be directed by the tenets 20of an established religious organization. However, general 21philosophical or moral reluctance to allow physical 22examinations, eye examinations, immunizations, vision and 23hearing screenings, or dental examinations does not provide a 24sufficient basis for an exception to statutory requirements. 25The local school authority is responsible for determining if 26the content of the Certificate of Religious Exemption   HB1374- 16 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1constitutes a valid religious objection. The local school 2authority shall inform the parent or legal guardian of 3exclusion procedures, in accordance with the Department's 4rules under Part 690 of Title 77 of the Illinois 5Administrative Code, at the time the objection is presented. 6    If the physical condition of the child is such that any one 7or more of the immunizing agents should not be administered, 8the examining physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 9or physician assistant responsible for the performance of the 10health examination shall endorse that fact upon the health 11examination form.12    Exempting a child from the health, dental, or eye 13examination does not exempt the child from participation in 14the program of physical education training provided in 15Sections 27-5 through 27-7 of this Code.16    (8.5) The school board of a school district shall include 17informational materials regarding influenza and influenza 18vaccinations developed, provided, or approved by the 19Department of Public Health under Section 2310-700 of the 20Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the Civil 21Administrative Code of Illinois when the board provides 22information on immunizations, infectious diseases, 23medications, or other school health issues to the parents or 24guardians of students.25    (9) For the purposes of this Section, "nursery schools" 26means those nursery schools operated by elementary school   HB1374- 17 -LRB104 06163 LNS 16197 b1systems or secondary level school units or institutions of 2higher learning.3(Source: P.A. 103-985, eff. 1-1-25.)